Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2424
Providers of continuing competency activities; review and approval; fee.

Providers of continuing competency activities or licensees may submit courses for review and approval by the board. Each provider or licensee applying for approval of continuing competency activities shall pay an application fee for each program, seminar, or course submitted for review.

Laws 1972, LB 1040, § 7;

Laws 1986, LB 926, § 58;

Laws 1988, LB 693, § 11;

R.S.Supp.,1988, § 71-2045.03;

Laws 1992, LB 1019, § 87;

Laws 1999, LB 411, § 6;

Laws 2002, LB 1021, § 93;

Laws 2002, LB 1062, § 59;

Laws 2003, LB 242, § 135;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-6060;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 839.